Maine, session 132, LD812.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30 MRSA c. 605 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 605
STATE RECOGNITION OF KINEO ST. JOHN TRIBE
§7301. Recognition of Kineo St. John Tribe
1. Recognition. The Kineo St. John Tribe is recognized by the State as a Native
American tribe.
2. Effect of recognition. Recognition of the Kineo St. John Tribe may not be
construed to create, extend or form the basis of any right or claim to land or real estate in
the State or any right to conduct gambling activities prohibited by law. The Kineo St. John
Tribe and the individual members of the tribe remain subject to all the laws of the State.